Georgia, session 2025_26, HB644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 12-2-2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to Environmental
Protection Division, Environmental Advisory Council, duties of council and its members and
director, appeal procedures generally, permit applications, and inspections, is amended by
adding a new subparagraph to paragraph (1) of subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(C) The director may deny an application for any permit issued pursuant to
Chapter 4, 5, 7, or 9 of this title if when processing the application the director
determines that the applicant's regulatory history, including, but not limited to, such
applicant's history of violations of environmental laws or regulations and any criminal
H. B. 644
- 1 -

LC 44 3112
or civil penalties incurred by such applicant in any other state, warrant denial of the
permit."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 644
- 2 -